Utah statutes.
78B-3-413.   Professional liability insurance coverage for providers -- Insurance commissioner may require joint underwriting authority.

(1)  The commissioner may, after a public hearing, find that professional liability insurance coverage for health care providers is not readily available in the voluntary market in a specific part of this state, and that the public interest requires that action be taken.

(2)  The commissioner may promulgate rules and implement plans to provide insurance coverage through all insurers issuing professional liability policies and individual and group accident and sickness policies providing medical, surgical or hospital expense coverage on either a prepaid or an expense incurred basis, including personal injury protection and medical expense coverage issued incidental to liability insurance policies.



Amended by Chapter 146, 2009 General Session

